California, session 20252026, AB2295.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 65584.2.3 is added to the Government Code, to read:65584.2.3. (a) A local government may enter into a voluntary agreement with another local government to allow new housing development projects to count toward each locality’s share of the regional housing needs allocation if both of the following conditions are met:(1) The housing development project is jointly funded by the local governments that are parties to the agreement, with at least sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) per unit in funds awarded by the local governments in total.(2) The housing development project includes affordable housing units for very low and lower income households, as described in Sections 50052.5 and 50053 of the Health and Safety Code.(b) For purposes of this section, “local government” means a city, including a charter city, a county, including a charter county, or a city and county, including a charter city and county.